Washington statutes.
RCW 6.17.050

Stay of execution—Judgment against surety on bond if not paid.

If execution of a judgment is stayed as permitted by RCW 6.17.040 and the judgment is not satisfied at expiration of the stay period, at any time thereafter the judgment creditor may, upon motion supported by an affidavit that the judgment or any part of it is unpaid and stating how much still remains due, have judgment against the surety on the bond for the balance remaining due, and have an execution on the judgment against the surety, on which stay shall not be allowed.

[ 1987 c 442 s 405.]